Florida, session 2026, HB1363.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 322.003, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
323.003 Towing disabled vehicles; notification.—
(1) When a motor vehicle is disabled due to a motor
vehicle crash and a wrecker operator is needed to tow the
vehicle:
(a) If law enforcement is impounding the vehicle, a law
enforcement officer shall provide the driver with a list of
wrecker operators the driver may choose from; or
(b) The driver may call a wrecker operator of his or her
choice.
(2) The law enforcement officer and the wrecker operator
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1363-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1363 2026
shall inform the driver of the vehicle storage charge per day,
the telephone number and e-mail address of the wrecker operator
storage facility to which the vehicle is being towed, and the
process for the owner to retrieve the vehicle.
(3) The wrecker operator storage facility shall notify the
owner of the vehicle in writing by certified mail and by
telephone and text message 14 business days, 30 business days,
and 45 business days after the vehicle arrives at the facility
stating that the vehicle is in storage and accruing daily
storage charges.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1363-00